S.  529,  TO  AUTHORIZE  APPROPRIATIONS  FOR 

THE  U.S.  ANTI–DOPING  AGENCY

S.  HRG.  109–212

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  24,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

24–722 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 24, 2005 ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Blake,  Roger,  Assistant  Executive  Director,  California  Interscholastic
Federation .............................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Catlin,  Don  H.,  M.D.,  Professor  of  Molecular  and  Medical  Pharmacology, 
UCLA Medical School ..........................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Madden, Terry, CEO, U.S. Anti-Doping Agency (USADA) ..................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Scherr, Jim, Chief Executive Officer, U.S. Olympic Committee ..........................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
White, Kelli, Former U.S. Athlete ..........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1
2

15
16

18
20
7
9
3
5
10
13

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

S.  529,  TO  AUTHORIZE  APPROPRIATIONS  FOR 

THE  U.S.  ANTI–DOPING  AGENCY 

TUESDAY,  MAY  24,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:03  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  McCain,
presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Good  morning.  I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Ste-
vens  for  calling  this  hearing  and  for  extending  the  courtesy  of  the 
gavel  to  me  this  morning,  and  I  appreciate  it  very  much.  I  would 
also  like  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  to  discuss  the  au-
thorization  of  the  United  States  Anti–Doping  Agency,  known  as 
USADA, and the sports doping challenges our country faces. 

For 5 years USADA has served as the official anti-doping agency 
for  Olympic  sports  in  the  United  States.  In  that  role  USADA  has 
shown  a  tremendous  dedication  to  eliminating  doping  in  sports 
through research, education, testing, and adjudication efforts. Most 
recently,  USADA  was  instrumental  in  the  identification  and  adju-
dication  of  several  Olympic  athletes  implicated  in  the  ongoing 
BALCO  scandal.  With  the  assistance  of  documents  subpoenaed  by 
this Committee and released last year to the agency by the unani-
mous consent of the Senate, USADA helped ensure that the Olym-
pic  team  the  U.S.  sent  to  the  Athens  Olympics  last  summer  was 
as clean as it could be. 

Despite  USADA’s  successes,  the  fact  remains  that  we  may  be 
falling  behind  in  what  is  truly  an  arms  race  of  doping.  As  soon  as 
a  new  doping  substance  is  discovered,  it  seems  that  we  know  that 
there  is  a  new  and  undetectable  substance  that  is  being  used  by 
athletes.  I  look  forward  to  the  witnesses’  testimony  on  USADA’s 
and others’ efforts to keep up with doping innovations. 

In addition, I would appreciate the views of the witnesses on the 
performance  of  USADA  to  date,  as  well  as  its  role  in  the  ongoing 
effort to take doping out of sports. For example, I would appreciate 
hearing  whether  USADA  could  help  clean  up  professional  sports, 
which have been a major focus because of the influence that profes-
sional  athletes,  like  Olympic  athletes,  have  on  our  Nation’s  youth. 
Ultimately,  the  anti-doping  effort  is  one  that  I  endorse  because 
I  want  to  protect  our  youngest  generations  from  the  dangers  of 
steroids  and  other  substances  that  may  unfairly  enhance  perform-

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

ance and that take a serious toll on the health and safety of Amer-
ica’s kids. 

I  want  to  thank  Senator  Stevens  again  for  calling  this  hearing 
and  I  thank  the  witnesses.  I  would  also  like  to  take  this  oppor-
tunity  to  thank  Senator  Stevens  for  his  efforts  in  the  coordination 
between the Greek Government and the U.S. Government in ensur-
ing a successful Olympics in Athens, thanks in large part to the co-
ordination of security forces of the United States and Greece. 

I thank you, Senator Stevens. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  McCain.  I  too 
welcome  the  witnesses,  who  traveled  great  distances  to  be  here 
today. I want to thank you, Senator McCain, for chairing this hear-
ing and for your continued commitment to the U.S. Olympic move-
ment and to drug-free sports in general. 

The  actions  we  took  as  a  Committee  last  year  ensured  that  the 
United States did not send athletes who were not drug-free to Ath-
ens. Those were unprecedented actions and I thank the U.S. Olym-
pic Committee and the people who are here, for this unprecedented 
action. 

As  someone  who  worked  for  the  creation  of  the  U.S.  Olympic 
Committee and who has been involved now with Olympic issues in 
the  Senate  for  almost  37  years,  I  reflect  back  with  great  pride  on 
the  tremendous  accomplishments  of  our  U.S.  Olympic  teams.  I 
have  grown  increasingly  concerned  about  the  dramatic  increase  in 
doping at all levels of athletics, particularly among our youth. Sev-
eral years ago I traveled with Donna DeVerona to Geneva to meet 
with  the  International  Olympic  Committee  to  express  our  great 
concern over doping. 

In 2003, in a survey of over 15,000 high school students, the U.S. 
Center for Disease Control found that more than 6 percent of high 
school  students  admitted  using  non-prescription  illegal  steroids  at 
some  point  in  their  lives.  To  me  that  is  unacceptable.  Doping  is  a 
stain at all levels of athletes that taints the accomplishments of our 
elite  athletes,  creates  unattainable  expectations  for  our  young  ath-
letes, and threatens their physical well-being. 

I  do  commend  the  work  of  the  U.S.  Anti-Doping  Agency.  It  is 
doing  great  work  on  behalf  of  the  U.S.  Olympic  Committee  and 
much  more  remains  to  be  done.  But  I  do  look  forward  to  working 
with  you,  Senator  McCain,  and  the  rest  of  the  Committee  to  carry 
out your commitment, all of our commitment, to mitigate the prob-
lem of doping. 

I  have  another  committee  meeting  this  morning,  so  I  hope  you 

will excuse me. Thank you all very much. 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. I appre-

ciate your continued involvement. 

Our panel this morning is: Mr. Jim Scherr, who is the Chief Ex-
ecutive  Officer  of  the  U.S.  Olympic  Committee;  Mr.  Terrence  Mad-
den,  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  USADA;  Ms.  Kelli  White,  former 
U.S.  Olympic  athlete;  Mr.  Roger  Blake,  Assistant  Executive  Direc-
tor  of  the  California  Interscholastic  Federation;  and  Mr.  Don 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

Catlin,  Professor  of  Molecular  and  Medical  Pharmacology  at  the 
UCLA Medical School. 

Welcome.  We  will  begin  with  you,  Mr.  Scherr,  and  move  down 

the line. It is good to see you again and thanks for being here. 

STATEMENT OF JIM SCHERR, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

U.S. OLYMPIC COMMITTEE 

Mr.  SCHERR.  Thank  you.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman.  My 
name,  as  you  know,  is  Jim  Scherr  and  I  am  the  Chief  Executive 
Officer  of  the  United  States  Olympic  Committee.  I  am  here  rep-
resenting  the  USOC  and  its  entire  board  of  directors.  Our  Chair, 
Peter Ueberroth, is currently in Europe. He has been meeting with 
the  organization  committee  in  China  and  the  IOC.  Otherwise  he 
would have been more than happy to be here himself. 

On their behalf, I am presenting testimony in support of the au-
thorization  for  the  United  States  Anti-Doping  Agency,  known  by 
the  acronym  ‘‘USADA,’’  an  independent  entity  that  the  USADA  as 
well as this Committee had a hand in creating back in 2000 to lead 
the  fight  against  doping  in  Olympic  sport.  Quite  simply,  in  the 
opinion of the USOC, USADA is doing the job it was created to per-
form  and  in  doing  so  has  become  the  model  national  anti-doping 
agency  and  organization  for  the  world.  It  can  do  more  and  should 
do  more,  but  perhaps  it  should  become  a  resource  for  performance 
and college sports as well. For it to do more, USADA would require 
additional  resources  from  sources  other  than  the  USOC,  yet  to  be 
determined. 

But  before  considering  the  future,  let  me  briefly  summarize  how 
the  USOC  and  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee  brought  USADA 
to this point. On October 20, 1999, against the backdrop of increas-
ing public and media attention to the issue of performance-enhanc-
ing  drug  use  in  sports,  this  Committee  conducted  a  hearing  at 
which  a  number  of  experts,  athletes,  academicians,  and  interested 
parties  testified.  Among  the  witnesses  were  representatives  of  the 
USOC.  In  their  testimony  and  subsequent  exchanges  with  Com-
mittee  members,  they  described  the  existing  drug  testing  program 
for U.S. Olympic and Paralympic athletes, noting that, with the ex-
ception  of  actual  Olympic  and  Paralympic  competition  and  some 
world-level  competitions,  the  USOC  was  responsible  for  testing  its 
athletes.  They  observed  that  this  practice  would  appear  to  rep-
resent  a  conflict  because  the  USOC  is  charged  with  the  responsi-
bility  of  fielding  a  team  whose  objective  is  to  win  medals  and  one 
might not have the greatest confidence that this same organization 
would penalize a potential medal winner for a drug infraction. 

In  addition,  these  athletes  and  their  public  personas  dictate  in 
large  part  our  television  revenues  and  marketing  revenues.  In  ad-
dition  but  more  important,  with  the  development  of  so-called  ‘‘de-
signer drugs’’ that avoided detection by standard analytical means, 
it  became  apparent  that  a  more  professional  and  sophisticated 
process for testing would have to be developed and an organization 
created  to  conduct  a  comprehensive  ongoing  program  that  would 
ensure  that  America’s  Olympic  and  Paralympic  athletes  would  be 
clean and competing on a level playing field. 

Describing  the  findings  of  the  USOC  task  force  that  had  been 
formed  to  address  this  issue,  key  recommendations  were  outlined, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

which  included  the  creation  of  an  external,  independent,  trans-
parent  organization  that  would  conduct  a  comprehensive  anti-
doping  program  on  behalf  of  the  U.S.  Olympic  Committee.  Its  re-
sponsibilities  would  include  testing,  adjudication,  education,  and 
research,  and  it  would  operate  with  a  professional  staff  under  the 
oversight  of  a  board  of  directors  drawing  from  the  sports,  medical, 
and at-large community—I might add, an independent board of di-
rectors. 

Initial funding would come from the USOC, with the expectation 
that  for  this  entity  to  do  the  job  expected  of  it  by  the  USOC  and 
this  Committee  funding  would  have  to  come  from  other  sources, 
primarily the Federal Government. 

This  proposal,  thankfully,  was  well  received  by  this  Committee 
and partially on that basis, and with its implicit support, this inde-
pendent  drug  agency,  soon  to  be  named  USADA,  was  launched, 
taking  complete  responsibility  for  the  testing  of  U.S.  Olympic  and 
Paralympic  athletes,  on  October  1,  2000.  With  initial  funding  pro-
vided jointly by the USOC and the Federal Government, during its 
first 15 months USADA conducted nearly 7,000 in-competition ath-
lete  drug  tests  and  approximately  3,700  unannounced  out  of  com-
petition tests of American athletes. 

This  was  and  is  a  remarkable  accomplishment  during  what  was 
essentially  a  startup  period  for  a  new  organization  that  had  to  es-
tablish  procedures,  develop  protocols,  and  attend  to  the  most  basic 
tasks,  such  as  securing  office  space  and  building  a  staff  that  could 
attend to the many mechanical and administrative details required 
to  operate  in  the  manner  expected  of  it  by  the  USOC  and  by  Con-
gress. 

Since  that  time,  USADA  has  expanded  its  scope  of  activity,  in-
creased  its  aggressiveness,  and  greatly  improved  its  overall  effec-
tiveness of operation, earning widespread respect both domestically 
and  internationally.  In  doing  so,  it  has  largely  dispelled  what  was 
previously  a  widespread  international  impression  that  some  Amer-
ican  athletes  were  drug  cheaters  with  their  behavior  condoned  by 
their respective sports federations. 

This  hearing  today,  as  well  as  ones  conducted  recently  by  other 
Congressional  Committees  on  the  issue  of  doping  in  professional 
sports, suggests that Congressional leaders believe that the Federal 
Government  has  a  role  to  play  in  addressing  the  issue  of  drug  use 
in  sports  at  all  levels.  We  also  think  that  it  does.  The  reality  is 
that,  while  professional  as  well  as  college  and  Olympic  sports  are 
private activities, the actions of the athletes are in the public arena 
and  have  far-reaching  social  and  health  consequences.  We  are  in 
agreement that performance-enhancing drug use has become a na-
tional  issue  that  must  be  attacked  at  the  Federal  level,  with  the 
Federal  Government  serving  as  a  major  participant  and  bringing 
with it the necessary financial resources to do the job. 

During  the  recent  hearings  on  drug  testing  programs  in  profes-
sional  sports,  it  was  suggested  that  perhaps  USADA  should  be  ex-
panded  to  perform  the  same  function  for  the  professional  leagues 
and  perhaps  the  NCAA  that  it  does  for  the  American  Olympic 
movement.  Without  addressing  the  legal,  structural,  and  logistical 
challenge,  as  well  as  complicated  collective  bargaining  agreements 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

and other concerns, we believe that that proposal warrants serious 
consideration. 

Our  experience  with  USADA  has  been  positive  and  has  freed  us 
up to devote more attention and financial resources to the develop-
ment  and  support  of  American  Olympic  and  Paralympic  athletes, 
and  it  has  brought  credibility,  much  needed  credibility,  to  our  ef-
forts  to  combat  doping  in  sport  as  we  have  led  by  example.  We 
would  expect  that  other  sports  bodies  would  experience  similar 
benefits  and  therefore  we  believe  they  would  welcome  external-
ization of the whole drug testing program and adjudication process, 
as we have done. 

But regardless of whether USADA becomes the entity for use by 
professional  and  other  sports  leagues,  because  the  USOC  is  reach-
ing  the  limits  of  its  ability  to  increase  our  funding  to  USADA, 
USADA  should  receive  all  the  support  possible  from  the  Federal 
Government so that it can continue its aggressive program that has 
been  so  effective 
in  Olympic  and 
Paralympic  sport  and  to  expand  its  research  activities  that  are  so 
important  in  staying  ahead  of  those  who  are  constantly  trying  to 
develop substances intended to defy detection. 

in  eliminating  drug  use 

We  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  on  behalf  of  USADA 
today  and  for  the  ongoing  support  and  partnership  of  this  Com-
mittee  in  our  joint  effort  to  address  this  very  important  issue.  We 
think the fruit of this partnership, USADA, has more than fulfilled 
our  early  expectations  when  we  first  discussed  this  concept  nearly 
6 years ago and believe that with increased Federal support it will 
become an even more effective weapon to be used to eradicate this 
growing national problem. 

I  would  also  conclude  with  again  thanking  you  and  Senator  Ste-
vens  for  the  very  important  support  that  we  received  to  field  a 
team  at  Athens  and  the  support  that  the  Athens  organizing  com-
mittee  received  from  our  government  to  support  their  Olympic 
games and for the successful performance of the U.S. team. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Scherr follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JIM SCHERR, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER,

U.S. OLYMPIC COMMITTEE 

Good  morning  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Jim 
Scherr  and  I  am  the  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the  United  States  Olympic  Com-
mittee.  I  am  here  representing  the  USOC  and  its  entire  Board  of  Directors,  whose 
Chairman, Peter Ueberroth, is currently in Europe. On their behalf I am presenting 
testimony in support of an authorization for the United States Anti-Doping Agency, 
known  by  the  acronym  ‘‘USADA,’’  an  independent  entity  that  the  USOC  as  well  as 
this Committee had a hand in creating back in 2000 to lead the fight against doping 
in Olympic Sport. 

Quite simply, in the opinion of the USOC, USADA is doing the job it was created 
to perform, and in so doing, has become the model national anti-doping organization 
for  the  world.  It  can  and  should  do  more,  and  perhaps  it  should  become  a  resource 
for professional and college sports as well, but for it to do more USADA will require 
additional resources from sources other than the USOC yet to be determined. 

But  before  considering  the  future  let  me  briefly  summarize  how  the  USOC  and 

the Senate Commerce Committee brought USADA to this point. 

On  October  20,  1999,  against  the  backdrop  of  increasing  public  and  media  atten-
tion  to  the  issue  of  performance-enhancing  drug  use  in  sports,  this  Committee  con-
ducted  a  hearing  at  which  a  number  of  experts,  athletes,  academicians  and  inter-
ested  parties  testified.  Among  the  witnesses  were  representatives  of  the  United 
States Olympic Committee. In their testimony and subsequent exchanges with Com-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

mittee Members, they described the existing drug testing program for U.S. Olympic 
and  Paralympic  athletes,  noting  that  with  the  exception  of  actual  Olympic  and 
Paralympic competition, the USOC was responsible for testing its athletes. They ob-
served  that  this  practice  would  appear  to  represent  a  conflict  because  the  USOC  is 
charged with the responsibility of fielding a team whose objective is to win medals, 
and  one  might  not  have  the  greatest  confidence  that  this  same  organization  would 
penalize  a  potential  medal-winner  for  a  drug  infraction.  But  more  important,  with 
the development of so-called ‘‘designer drugs’’ that avoided detection by standard an-
alytical  means  it  became  apparent  that  a  more  professional  and  sophisticated  proc-
ess  for  testing  would  have  to  be  developed  and  an  organization  created  to  conduct 
a  comprehensive  ongoing  program  that  would  ensure  that  America’s  Olympic  and 
Paralympic athletes would be competing on a level playing field. 

Describing  the  findings  of  a  USOC  task  force  that  had  been  formed  to  address 
this issue, key recommendations were outlined which included the creation of an ex-
ternal,  independent,  transparent  organization  that  would  conduct  a  comprehensive 
anti-doping  program  on  behalf  of  the  USOC.  Its  responsibilities  would  include  test-
ing,  adjudication,  education,  and  research,  and  would  operate  with  a  professional 
staff under the oversight of a board of directors drawn from the sports, medical, and 
at-large  community.  Initial  funding  would  come  from  the  USOC,  with  the  expecta-
tion  that  for  this  entity  to  do  the  job  expected  of  it  by  the  USOC  and  this  Com-
mittee,  funding  would  have  to  come  from  other  sources,  primarily  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment. 

The proposal was well-received by the Committee, and partially on that basis and 
with  its  implicit  support,  this  independent  drug  agency,  soon  to  be  named  USADA, 
was  launched,  taking  complete  responsibility  for  the  testing  of  U.S.  Olympic  and 
Paralympic athletes on October 1, 2000. With initial funding provided jointly by the 
USOC  and  the  Federal  Government,  during  its  first  fifteen  months  USADA  con-
ducted  nearly  7,000  in-competition  athlete  drug  tests  and  approximately  3,700  un-
announced, out-of-competition tests of American athletes. This was a remarkable ac-
complishment during what was essentially a start-up period for a new organization 
that  had  to  establish  procedures,  develop  protocols,  and  attend  to  the  most  basic 
tasks  such  as  securing  office  space  and  building  a  support  staff  that  could  attend 
to the myriad mechanical and administrative details required to operate in the man-
ner expected of it by the USOC and by Congress. 

Since  that  time  USADA  has  expanded  its  scope  of  activity,  increased  its  aggres-
siveness,  and  greatly  improved  its  overall  effectiveness  of  operation,  earning  wide-
spread respect both domestically and internationally. In so doing it has largely dis-
pelled what was previously a widespread international impression that some Amer-
ican Olympic athletes were drug cheaters, with their behavior condoned by their re-
spective sports federations. 

This  hearing  today  as  well  as  ones  conducted  recently  by  other  Congressional 
Committees  on  the  issue  of  doping  in  professional  sports  suggests  that  Congres-
sional leaders believe that the Federal Government has a role to play in addressing 
the  issue  of  drug  use  in  sports  at  all  levels.  We  also  think  that  it  does.  The  reality 
is  that  while  professional  as  well  as  college  and  Olympic  sports  are  private  activi-
ties, the actions of the athletes are in the public arena, and have far-reaching social 
and  health  consequences.  We  are  in  agreement  that  performance-enhancing  drug 
use  has  become  a  national  issue  that  must  be  attacked  at  the  federal  level,  with 
the  Federal  Government  serving  as  a  major  participant,  and  bringing  with  it  the 
financial resources to do the job. 

During the recent hearings on drug testing programs in professional sports it was 
suggested  that  perhaps  USADA  should  be  expanded  to  perform  the  same  function 
for  the  professional  leagues  and  perhaps  the  NCAA  that  it  does  for  the  American 
Olympic  Movement.  Without  addressing  the  legal,  structural,  and  logistical  chal-
lenges  as  well  as  complicated  collective  bargaining  and  other  concerns,  we  believe 
that  the  proposal  warrants  serious  consideration.  Our  experience  with  USADA  has 
been  positive  and  has  freed  us  up  to  devote  more  attention  and  financial  resources 
to the development and support of American Olympic and Paralympic athletes, and 
it  has  brought  credibility  to  our  efforts  to  combat  doping  in  sport  as  we  have  led 
by example. We would expect that other sports bodies would experience similar ben-
efits  and,  therefore,  they  would  welcome  externalizing  the  whole  drug  testing  and 
adjudication processes as we have done. 

But regardless of whether USADA becomes the entity for use by professional and 
other  sports  leagues,  because  the  USOC  is  reaching  the  limits  of  its  ability  to  in-
crease  its  funding  of  USADA,  USADA  should  receive  all  the  support  possible  from 
the  Federal  Government  so  that  it  can  continue  its  aggressive  program  that  has 
been  so  effective  in  eliminating  drug  use  in  Olympic  and  Paralympic  sport,  and  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

expand  its  research  activities  that  are  so  important  in  staying  ahead  of  those  who 
are constantly trying to develop substances intended to defy detection. 

We  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  in  support  of  USADA  today  and  for 
the ongoing support and partnership of this Committee in our joint effort to address 
this  important  issue.  We  think  that  the  fruit  of  this  partnership—USADA—has 
more than fulfilled our early expectations when we first discussed the concept near-
ly  6  years  ago,  and  believe  that  with  increased  federal  support  it  will  become  an 
even  more  effective  weapon  to  be  used  to  eradicate  this  growing  national  problem.

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you and congratulations. 
Mr. Madden, welcome back. 
STATEMENT OF TERRY MADDEN, CEO, U.S. ANTI–DOPING 

AGENCY (USADA) 

Mr.  MADDEN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  appreciate  it.  Since  this  is 
my  fourth  appearance  before  this  Committee  and  the  eighth  ap-
pearance  by  USADA  before  some  committee  on  Capitol  Hill,  I  am 
going  to  set  aside  my  testimony  and  ask  you  to  admit  it  into  the 
record and just talk for a few moments directly with you. 

Senator MCCAIN. Without objection. 
Mr.  MADDEN.  When  I  accepted  this  position  5  years  ago  as  CEO 
of USADA, I made a few international trips abroad. We wanted to 
steal the best ideas from other international drug testing agencies. 
In  my  travels  I  quickly  learned  that  the  international  community, 
sporting  community,  viewed  the  United  States  athletes,  both  pro-
fessional  and  amateur,  at  any  level  as  the  biggest  cheaters  in  the 
world. In fact, some people wanted to equate us with the East Ger-
man system. 

I did not believe that for a minute then and I do not now. I think 
the large majority of our athletes are attempting to compete clean. 
They  want  to  do  it  the  right  way.  But  it  pointed  up  the  funda-
mental reason why USADA was created and that was that the test-
ing had to be externalized from the USOC, an independent agency 
had  to  be  created,  and  the  prosecution  of  athletes  who  had  tested 
positive  needed  to  be  removed  from  the  sporting  federations,  the 
national governing bodies of sport in this country. 

So  USADA  was  created  in  2000.  We  were  given  four  mandates: 
testing,  adjudication,  research,  and  education.  Our  bywords  are 
independence  and  transparency.  By  ‘‘transparency’’  I  mean  we  an-
nounce  everything.  Once  the  athlete  has  either  admitted  to  the 
drug  testing  positive  or  has  gone  through  our  protocols  and  proce-
dures and the hearing process, we announce it. Nothing is covered 
up  any  more.  There  can  be  no  more  of  those  accusations  against 
United States athletes. 

In  the  area  of  testing,  that  first  year  we  did  4,000  tests.  This 
past year in 2004, we did about 8,150 tests, of which about 58 per-
cent  were  out  of  competition  tests.  As  you  know,  that  is  where  we 
go and test at their home or at their place of work or at their train-
ing  site.  We  are  most  proud  of  our  out  of  competition  testing  pro-
gram because it is totally no-notice and it is a year-round program. 
As  Jim  stated,  most  of  our  funding  now  comes  from  the  Federal 
Government.  Sixty-five  percent  comes  from  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  and  35  percent  from  the  United  States  Olympic  Committee. 
Getting  to  the  basic  facts  here,  though,  sport  has  become  in-
grained in our culture. It is part of our fabric, part of our everyday 
life.  Your  children  and  grandchildren,  my  children,  everybody’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

children  in  this  room,  are  participating  in  sport  at  some  level, 
whether it is stickball in the New York City streets or a highly or-
ganized  track  and  field  meet  at  the  high  school  or  collegiate  level 
in California. It has become an important part of our existence, an 
important part of American lives. 

Performance-enhancing drugs, though, have become a significant 
issue  within  sport  at  every  level.  This  junk  or  crap,  whatever  you 
want to refer to it, is seeping down through the professional ranks, 
to  the  collegiate  level,  to  the  high  school  level.  Unfortunately,  now 
we  are  finding  it  in  the  middle  schools  and  the  grade  school  level. 
The  latest  survey  I  saw  out  last  week,  one  that  is  rather  sur-
prising  and  will  address  both  issues  that  I  want  to  bring  here 
today,  is  that  7  percent  of  middle  school  and  pre-high  school  girls 
are  now  taking  performance-enhancing  drugs,  not  necessarily  to 
compete  as  athletes,  but  to  get  the  buff  look  and  look  well  among 
their friends. 

What  I  am  leading  up  to  here  is  this  Nation  is  facing  not  only 
a crisis in sport by the use of performance-enhancing drugs, but we 
are  facing  a  health  crisis.  Dr.  Catlin  can  go  into  all  the  effects  of 
steroids, and they are numerous, both in men and women, and es-
pecially  our  children.  But  this  stuff  is  now  seeping  down  into  the 
grade school level and we, the Congress, USADA, all sporting orga-
nizations,  need  to  address  this  as  a  health  issue  as  well  as  a  com-
petitive issue. 

Make  no  mistake  about  it.  Taking  performance-enhancing  sub-
stances  to  compete  in  athletics  is  cheating.  You  are  a  drug  cheat 
when  you  do  that.  There  is  no  other  way  around  it.  And  you  are 
also harming your personal health. 

I  just  want  to  say,  so  many  times  the  rights  of  the  accused  are 
addressed, and the rights of the accused in the USADA system are 
addressed  by  us.  They  have  all  the  rights  based  upon  the  United 
States Constitution and our judicial system. But the rights of clean 
athletes  are  too  long,  too  often  ignored  or  not  mentioned  in  the 
media.  Those  are  the  rights  we  have  to  be  concerned  with.  Those 
are  the  rights  that  USADA  wants  to  address,  the  rights  of  clean 
athletes. 

I  will  tell  you,  I  bet  if  a  poll  is  taken,  a  private  poll  of  profes-
sional athletes, amateur athletes, athletes at the high school level, 
whatever  level  you  want  to  address,  I  will  assure  you  that  those 
athletes when they get in the starting blocks, when they are at bat, 
when  they  are  in  the  swimming  lane,  whatever  it  is,  they  want  to 
know  that  they  are  competing  on  a  level  playing  field.  They  want 
to know that all the other people, all the other participants in that 
event, are clean. 

Those  are  the  rights  of  the  clean  athletes.  Those  are  the  rights 
that  need  to  be  addressed,  whether  in  competing  on  a  professional 
or amateur level. Those are the rights we are concerned with. 

I  want  to  just  bring  up  the  BALCO  situation  for  a  minute. 
USADA has addressed 15 cases so far. One of those includes Duane 
Chambers, the British athlete who received a 2-year suspension for 
THG.  We  have  2  more  cases  on  line  to  come  up  in  June  and  July 
involving  Tim  Montgomery  and  Christie  Gaines.  USADA  has  won 
all  13  cases.  These  cases—we  are  thankful  for  the  documents  this 
Committee involved—excuse me—this Committee delivered to us. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

I will say to you now, once we saw the indictments for the crimi-
nal  defendants  in  BALCO  last  February,  we  requested  from  the 
U.S. Attorney those documents. As you know, the Privacy Act they 
believe  precluded  them  from  delivering  those  documents.  You,  as 
your Committee of jurisdiction over the Olympic movement, asked, 
subpoenaed those documents from the Department of Justice. After 
a  thorough  review  by  your  staff  and  the  Senators—and  I  want  to 
bring  up  Senator  Hollings  here  as  well—by  unanimous  consent  it 
was  passed  and  those  over  9,000  documents  were  delivered  to 
USADA. 

They  have  been  used  in  prosecutions  to  date.  They  will  be  used 
in further prosecutions. I will tell you I do not think we have seen 
the end of BALCO, nor will it end very soon. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Madden follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TERRY MADDEN, CEO, U.S. ANTI-DOPING AGENCY 

(USADA) 

Mr. Chairman, Members of the Committee, good morning. My name is Terry Mad-
den  and  I  am  the  CEO  of  the  United  States  Anti-Doping  Agency  (USADA).  I  want 
to thank this Committee for its long-standing interest in clean sport and for the op-
portunity to testify this morning. 

USADA has been recognized by Congress as the independent, national anti-doping 
agency  for  Olympic  and  Paralympic  sport  in  the  United  States.  Our  mission  is  to 
protect  and  preserve  the  health  of  athletes,  the  integrity  of  competition,  and  the 
well-being  of  sport  through  the  elimination  of  doping.  Since  it  began  operations  on 
October  1,  2000,  USADA  has  been  responsible  for  managing  the  testing  and  adju-
dication  process  for  Olympic  and  Paralympic  athletes.  USADA  is  also  deeply  com-
mitted  to  education  and  research  initiatives,  which  are  fundamental  to  our  efforts 
to end doping in sports. 

USADA  welcomes  the  increased  attention  that  has  recently  been  focused  on  the 
use  of  performance-enhancing  drugs  in  sport.  In  this  age  of  dramatically  increased 
awards for athletic success, doping has, unfortunately, become an issue that affects 
every  sport  and  threatens  to  undermine  the  integrity  of  athletics  as  a  whole.  The 
true victims of doping are today’s clean athletes who want to compete in clean sport, 
the  young  athletes  of  tomorrow  who  are  being  deceived  into  believing  that  doping 
is  an  acceptable  path  to  winning  and  the  public  who  is  being  defrauded  by  athletic 
performances that are dependent on the use of drugs. 

Since  its  inception  in  2000,  USADA  has  worked  hard  to  protect  the  rights  of  the 
overwhelming  majority  of  the  United  States  Olympic  movement  athletes  who  com-
pete clean, by instituting policies that ensure that athletes who choose to cheat will 
be held accountable. 

The  USADA  anti-doping  program,  which  was  developed  with  the  assistance  and 
approval of athletes in the Olympic movement, begins with a comprehensive sample 
collection  plan  that  includes  appropriately  timed,  year-round,  no-advance-notice 
testing.  A  drug  testing  program  will  be  ineffective  if  athletes  know  during  what 
times  of  the  year  they  will  be  tested.  In  2004  USADA  collected  7,630  samples  from 
Olympic  movement  athletes.  Over  4,400  of  those  samples  were  collected  as  part  of 
USADA’s out-of-competition testing program. 

One lesson reinforced by the ongoing BALCO investigation, is that to be effective, 
an  anti-doping  program  must  incorporate  sufficient  flexibility  to  deal  with  the  cre-
ation  and  use  of  ‘‘designer  drugs.’’  Accordingly,  USADA’s  program  is  also  based  on 
a regularly updated, comprehensive list of prohibited substances and methods. 

An  effective  program  must  also  combine  clearly  defined  sanctions  of  sufficient 
magnitude  to  deter  drug  use  with  a  fair  means  of  imposing  such  sanctions.  In  the 
Olympic  movement  the  sanction  for  a  first  steroid  offense  is  a  2-year  suspension. 
A  second  steroid  offense  results  in  a  lifetime  ban.  Accordingly,  USADA’s  adjudica-
tion  system  includes  numerous  protections  for  athletes  to  ensure  that  only  athletes 
who commit a doping violation are sanctioned. Significantly, while USADA believes 
the privacy rights of individuals accused of doping must be respected, no individual’s 
privacy  right  should  outweigh  the  rights  of  all  athletes  to  compete  in  clean  sport 
and to be assured that those who break the rules are appropriately sanctioned. For 
these  reasons,  in  the  USADA  system,  once  an  athlete  has  been  found  to  have  com-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

mitted  a  violation  there  is  complete  public  disclosure  of  the  athlete’s  name  and  the 
nature of the offense. 

Another important focus of USADA’s program is the education of athletes regard-
ing the health risks associated with doping and the inherent value that is found in 
choosing to compete clean. To date more than 10,000 elite athletes and coaches have 
participated  in  education  presentations  by  USADA.  The  100%  Me  program,  tar-
geting  adolescent  youth  will  soon  be  expanded  to  focus  on  high  school  age  youth. 
Also,  USADA’s  goal  is  to  expand  ‘‘Crossroads’’,  the  5th  grade  in-school  curriculum 
which was developed with Scholastic Magazine. It is critical that both the elite ath-
letes  of  today  and  the  aspiring  athletes  of  tomorrow  learn  that  there  are  no  short-
cuts to true athletic achievement and that success through doping is winning with-
out honor. 

Finally,  USADA  dedicates  significant  resources  to  research  for  the  detection  of 
new  doping  substances  and  techniques  and  the  pursuit  of  scientific  excellence  in 
doping control. USADA is also strongly committed to funding continued research re-
garding the long term health risks associated with the use of prohibited substances. 
USADA’s  ongoing  commitment  to  research  is  demonstrated  through  the  approxi-
mately  2  million  dollars  per  year  in  grants  that  USADA  awards  to  fund  research 
initiatives aimed at fighting doping in sport. To date, USADA has awarded approxi-
mately  $1,250,000  for  the  development  of  a  scientifically  reliable  test  for  human 
growth hormone, a substance being used by dopers. 

We  believe  that  the  USADA  program  contains  all  of  the  important  elements  of 
a  comprehensive  and  effective  drug  deterrence  program  and  we  continue  to  work 
each day to improve our system and further protect the rights of clean athletes. Spe-
cifically,  we  are  focused  on  increasing  the  number  of  no-advance-notice  tests  that 
we  perform.  We  are  also  seeking  to  improve  our  ability  to  systematically  identify 
and  sanction  those  athletes  and  other  individuals  who  are  engaged  in  the  effort  to 
create  designer  substances  or  otherwise  gain  an  advantage  over  athletes  who  are 
competing  clean.  To  this  end,  we  continue  to  work  with  the  Department  of  Justice 
and  the  United  States  Attorney  for  the  Northern  District  of  California  in  the  ongo-
ing investigation into the BALCO doping conspiracy. 

The  BALCO  investigation  has  also  highlighted  the  great  lengths  that  some  ath-
letes  will  go  to  in  an  effort  to  obtain  an  unfair  advantage  through  doping.  The 
science  of  doping  is  constantly  evolving  and  complex  issues,  including  genetic  en-
hancement,  must  be  addressed.  If  USADA’s  efforts  to  uncover  these  sophisticated 
efforts  to  cheat,  through  comprehensive  testing,  research  and  education  programs 
is  to  be  successful  then  appropriate  resources  must  continue  to  be  allocated  to  the 
fight against doping. 

Since  its  inception  in  2000,  USADA  has  been  funded  through  a  combination  of 
contractual  payments  from  the  United  States  Olympic  Committee  (USOC)  and  an-
nual appropriations from Congress, ranging from $3 million in 2000 to $7.4 million 
in 2004. 

USADA  appreciates  the  support  of  the  USOC  in  this  important  struggle  against 
doping in the Olympic movement. USADA is also extremely appreciative of the com-
mitment  that  Congress  has  demonstrated  to  USADA  over  the  last  5  years.  The 
funds  designated  for  USADA  in  Senate  Bill  529  would  provide  much-needed  fiscal 
stability for USADA and would significantly advance USADA’s mission. 

As  the  Committee  with  jurisdiction  over  this  important  issue,  I  thank  you  again 
on  behalf  of  USADA  and  all  of  America’s  athletes  for  your  interest  in  and  commit-
ment  to  clean  sport  and  ask  that  you  approve  the  funding  for  USADA  set  forth  in 
Senate Bill 529. 

Thank you for your time this morning.

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you very much. 
Ms. White, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF KELLI WHITE, FORMER U.S. ATHLETE 

Ms.  WHITE.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Chairman,  esteemed 
Members  of  the  Committee.  I  would  like  to  say  thank  you  very 
much  for  allowing  me  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today. 
My  name  is  Kelli  White  and  I  appear  here  today  having  made  the 
regrettable  mistake  of  using  steroids  and  other  performance-en-
hancing drugs during my athletic career. 

With  my  experience  and  knowledge  regarding  use  of  perform-
ance-enhancing  drugs,  I  welcome  the  opportunity  to  assist  in  ef-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

forts  to  remove  doping  from  sport.  By  way  of  background,  I  com-
peted  in  track  and  field  for  most  of  my  life,  having  begun  at  the 
age  of  10.  In  my  early  teen  years  I  began  working  with  renowned 
coach  Remy  Korchemny,  who  would  remain  a  significant  figure  in 
my life over the next decade and a half. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Out  of  curiosity,  how  did  you—how  were  you 

matched up with him? 

Ms.  WHITE.  He  and  I  were  training  on  the  same  track  and  he 
asked  my  father  if  I  could  train  with  him,  and  my  dad  said  that 
was fine. 

Senator MCCAIN. I see. 
Ms. WHITE. I went on to compete collegiately and graduated from 
the University of Tennessee before turning professional in the year 
of  2000.  In  the  year  of  2000  I  returned  home  to  the  San  Francisco 
Bay area and began training full-time with Mr. Korchemny. Short-
ly  thereafter,  in  December  2000,  my  coach  introduced  me  to 
BALCO founder Victor Conte. 

Conte  initially  gave  me  a  package  containing  both  legal  supple-
ments  as  well  as  the  substance  later  known  as  designer  steroid 
THG. At the time I was unaware that anything I received from Mr. 
Conte was a prohibited performance-enhancing substance, as I was 
told  by  both  my  coach  and  Mr.  Conte  that  the  vial  they  had  given 
me contained flaxseed oil. 

A  few  weeks  later  Mr.  Conte  admitted  to  me  that  the  substance 
he  had  given  me  was  indeed  not  flaxseed  oil,  but  rather  a  prohib-
ited  substance  that,  if  not  taken  properly,  could  yield  a  positive 
drug  test.  I  immediately  ceased  using  the  liquid  because  at  that 
time  in  my  career  I  did  not  believe  it  was  necessary  to  take  per-
formance-enhancing drugs to be competitive. 

I competed over the next 2 years without the use of any perform-
ance-enhancing substances, despite being constantly urged to do so. 
I  was  continuously  being  told  that  the  usage  of  performance-en-
hancing substances was necessary to be competitive because every-
body else was doing so. 

My 2002 season was very difficult. I struggled with injuries most 
of  the  year.  I  had  a  great  deal  of  uncertainty  regarding  my  status 
for  the  2003  season  and  I  did  not  want  to  miss  any  part  of  that 
year.  I  failed  to  make  the  2003  world  indoor  team  and  was  receiv-
ing more pressure to start a performance-enhancing drug regimen. 
My advisers were pointing to other performances of other athletes, 
saying  that  I  needed  to  do  what  they  were  doing  in  order  to  com-
pete on that level. 

In  March  of  2003,  I  made  the  choice  that  I  will  forever  regret. 
I  visited  Mr.  Conte  at  his  lab,  which  was  near  my  home,  and  we 
sat  down  and  devised  a  program  to  utilize  performance-enhancing 
drugs in my training and competition. At that time I began taking 
EPO, the clear, which is known as THG, the cream, which is a tes-
tosterone,  and  stimulants.  I  remained  on  the  program  over  the 
course  of  4  months  and  with  the  help  of  Mr.  Conte  I  was  able  to 
pass  17  drug  tests,  both  in  and  out  of  competition,  while  utilizing 
these prohibited performance-enhancing substances. 

In  a  relatively  short  time  period,  I  had  gone  from  being  a  very 
competitive  sprinter  to  being  the  fastest  woman  in  the  world.  In 
June of 2003, I captured both the 100 and 200 meter United States 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

championships,  and  followed  that  by  winning  the  same  events  in 
the world championships in August in Paris. 

Although I crossed the finish line first in all those events, I knew 
in my heart it was accomplished partially because of the other line 
I  had  crossed.  Instead  of  what  should  have  been  the  high  point  of 
my  career  and  a  tremendous  accomplishment  in  my  life,  I  was 
ashamed  of  the  choices  I  had  made.  In  addition  to  enhancing  my 
performance  on  the  track,  there  were  other  physical  effects  I  en-
countered  while  taking  this  mix  of  substances.  My  blood  pressure 
was  elevated.  I  also  experienced  an  acne  problem,  increased  men-
strual cycle, and a slight vocal cord problem. 

The  first  and  only  failed  drug  test  I  experienced  was  following 
the world championship meet in Paris, when a stimulant known as 
modafinil  was  discovered  in  my  urine  sample.  But  the  penalty  for 
that  substance  would  not  even  have  been  a  suspension  from  track 
and field. 

A  few  weeks  after  the  world  championships,  the  FBI  and  other 
law  enforcement  agencies  raided  the  BALCO  laboratory.  A  few 
months  later  I  admitted  to  the  United  States  Anti-Doping  Agency 
officials  what  I  had  done,  as  I  outlined  for  you  today.  I  received  a 
2-year  ban  from  competition  for  my  actions  as  well  as  a  loss  of  re-
sults  from  my  previous  4  years  of  competition.  I  also  agreed  to  as-
sist  USADA  in  its  mission  to  clean  up  sport  and  now  offer  to  be 
of service to this Committee in any way you see fit. 

I  believe  athletes  who  use  performance-enhancing  drugs  are 
hurting  themselves,  cheating  the  public,  and  betraying  our  youth. 
A  performance-enhancing  drug  user  trades  his  or  her  overall 
health,  wellbeing,  and  integrity  for  a  shot  at  fame  and  fortune.  I 
believe it is important that you understand the reasons I made the 
choice to in essence cheat. I strongly believe that the use of steroids 
and  other  prohibited  performance-enhancing  drugs  are  wrong  and 
there is no place for such use in sports. 

However, athletes who have made that choice are not necessarily 
bad  people.  In  my  own  situation,  there  were  many  factors  contrib-
uting  to  the  very  poor  decision  I  made,  which  included  the  influ-
ence  of  a  long-time  trusted  coach.  But  most  importantly,  I  began 
using  these  substances  not  to  give  me  an  advantage,  but  because 
I  had  become  convinced  I  needed  them,  I  needed  to  use  them,  to 
level the playing field with my competitors. 

It  is  a  very  troubling  situation  to  have  trained  to  compete  in  a 
sport  at  the  highest  level,  but  feel  those  with  which  you  are  com-
peting have an unfair advantage. I make neither an excuse nor jus-
tification  for  my  horrible  choice.  I  merely  hope  to  lend  under-
standing to this Committee as to how someone who loved her sport 
and  trained  cleanly  for  most  of  her  life  got  involved  in  this  awful 
abuse. 

My  attorney  Jerrold  Colton  and  I  have  worked  with  assisting 
USADA in its efforts and we believe this Committee should further 
support  USADA  as  the  fight  is  a  very  difficult  one.  Being  mindful 
that  my  use  of  steroids  and  other  performance-enhancing  drugs 
was  not  detected  through  the  extensive  testing  I  received,  USADA 
needs  the  resources  to  go  further  in  its  fight  to  detect  the  people 
who  are  breaking  the  rules.  The  BALCO  scandal  may  not  have 
been discovered without a competitor’s coach anonymously sending 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

a  syringe  of  THG  to  USADA  testers,  which  ultimately  led  to  the 
discovery of this previously unknown steroid. 

Although  I  have  been  troubled  by  the  disparity  of  the  penalties 
facing  track  athletes  versus  other  sports,  I  am  mindful  we  are  not 
protected  by  a  players  association.  I  appreciate  the  many  reasons 
why this Committee previously subpoenaed the BALCO documents 
pertaining  only  to  the  track  and  field  athletes  and  turned  them 
over to USADA, rather than the other sports, but would like to see 
more equal treatment of all sports. 

I  also  believe  the  roles  of  some  national  governing  bodies  in-
volved  in  sports  and  the  coaches  which  either  assist  in  the  wrong-
doing  or  turn  their  backs  on  what  they  see  must  have  responsi-
bility,  culpability,  and  penalty  for  their  role  in  making  sport  un-
clean. 

The  fight  against  drugs  in  sport  is  an  extremely  difficult  battle. 
I  am  sorry  that  I  cheated  myself,  my  competitors,  my  sport,  my 
family,  and  the  public,  and  for  the  choices  I  made  in  the  past.  As 
athletes,  we  know  that  we  are  role  models  and  I  betrayed  my  re-
sponsibility  as  such.  Please  feel  free  to  call  on  me  to  play  any  role 
I  can  in  assisting  your  Committee,  USADA,  and  anyone  else  you 
see fit in this very important matter. I hope in doing so I help the 
sport  I  love  more  by  what  I  do  off  the  track  than  anything  I  could 
have ever done on it. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  your  attention  and  for  allowing  me  to 

appear here today. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. White follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KELLI WHITE, FORMER U.S. ATHLETE 

Mr. Chairman, esteemed Members of the Committee, thank you very much for al-
lowing  me  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  this  very  prestigious  group.  My  name 
is  Kelli  White,  and  I  appear  here  today  having  made  the  regrettable  mistake  of 
using steroids and other performance enhancing drugs during my athletic career as 
a  sprinter.  With  my  experience  and  knowledge  regarding  use  of  performance  en-
hancing  drugs,  I  welcome  the  opportunity  to  assist  in  the  efforts  to  remove  doping 
from sport. 

By  way  of  background,  I  competed  in  track  and  field  for  most  of  my  life,  having 
begun  at  the  age  of  10.  In  my  early  teen  years,  I  began  working  with  renowned 
coach  Remi  Korchemny,  who  would  remain  a  significant  figure  in  my  life  over  the 
next  decade  and  a  half.  I  went  on  to  compete  collegiately  and  graduate  from  the 
University  of  Tennessee  before  turning  professional  in  the  year  2000.  At  that  time, 
I returned home to the Bay area of California and began training full time with Mr. 
Korchemny. 

Shortly thereafter, in December 2000, my coach introduced me to BALCO founder 
Victor Conte. Conte initially gave me a package containing both legal supplements, 
as well as a substance which later became known as the clear or the designer ster-
oid THG. At the time, I was unaware that anything I received from Mr. Conte was 
a  prohibited  performance  enhancing  substance  as  I  was  told  by  both  my  coach  and 
Mr. Conte that the vial they had given me contained flaxseed oil. A few weeks later, 
Mr.  Conte  admitted  to  me  that  the  substance  he  had  given  me  was  indeed  not 
flaxseed oil, but rather a prohibited substance that if not taken properly, could yield 
a  positive  drug  test.  I  immediately  ceased  using  the  liquid  because  at  that  time  in 
my  career  I  did  not  believe  it  was  necessary  to  take  performance  enhancing  drugs 
to be competitive. I competed over the next 2 years without the use of any perform-
ance  enhancing  substances  despite  being  constantly  urged  to  do  so.  I  was  continu-
ously being told that the usage of performance enhancing substances were necessary 
to be competitive because everyone else was doing so. 

My  2002  season  was  very  difficult,  as  I  struggled  with  injuries  for  most  of  the 
year.  I  had  a  great  deal  of  uncertainty  regarding  my  status  as  I  entered  the  2003 
season, and I did not want to miss it. I failed to make the 2003 Indoor World Team, 
and  was  receiving  more  pressure  to  start  a  performance  enhancing  drug  regimen. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

My  advisors  were  pointing  to  other  performances  of  athletes,  and  saying  I  needed 
to do what they were doing in order to compete on that level. 

In  March  of  2003,  I  made  a  choice  that  I  will  forever  regret.  I  visited  Mr.  Conte 
at  his  lab  which  was  near  my  home,  and  we  sat  down  and  devised  a  program  to 
utilize  performance  enhancing  drugs  in  my  training  and  competition.  At  that  time, 
I  began  taking  EPO,  the  clear  (or  THG),  the  cream  and  stimulants.  I  remained  on 
this  program  over  the  course  of  4  months,  and  with  the  help  of  Mr.  Conte,  I  was 
able  to  pass  17  drug  tests  both  in  and  out  of  competition  while  utilizing  these  pro-
hibited performance enhancing substances. 

In a relatively short time period, I had gone from being a very competitive sprint-
er  to  being  the  fastest  woman  in  the  world!  In  June  2003,  I  captured  both  the  100 
and  200-meter  United  States  Championships,  and  followed  that  by  winning  the 
same  events  in  the  World  Championships  in  August  in  Paris.  Although  I  crossed 
the  finish  line  first  in  all  of  those  events,  I  knew  in  my  heart  it  was  accomplished 
partially because of the other line I had crossed. 

Instead  of  what  should  have  been  the  high  point  of  my  career  and  a  tremendous 
accomplishment  in  my  life,  I  was  ashamed  of  the  choices  I  had  made.  In  addition 
to  enhancing  my  performance  on  the  track,  there  were  other  physical  effects  I  en-
countered while taking this mix of substances. My blood pressure was elevated, and 
I also experienced an acne problem, increased menstrual cycle and slight vocal chord 
trouble.  The  first  and  only  failed  drug  test  I  experienced  was  following  the  World 
Championship  meet  in  Paris  when  a  stimulant  known  as  Modafinil  was  discovered 
in  my  urine  sample,  but  the  penalty  for  that  substance  would  not  have  been  even 
a suspension from track and field. 

A few weeks after the World Championships, the FBI and other law enforcement 
agencies  raided  the  BALCO  Laboratory.  A  few  months  later,  I  admitted  to  the 
United States Anti-Doping Agency (USADA) officials what I had done as I have out-
lined for you today. I received a 2-year ban from competition for my actions, as well 
as  lost  all  of  the  results  from  my  previous  4  years  of  competition.  I  also  agreed  to 
assist USADA in its mission to clean up sport, and now offer to be of service to this 
Committee in any way you see fit. I believe athletes who use performance-enhancing 
drugs  are  hurting  themselves,  cheating  the  public  and  betraying  our  youth.  A  per-
formance-enhancing drug user trades his or her overall health, well-being and integ-
rity for a shot at fame and fortune. 

I  believe  it  is  important  that  you  understand  the  reasons  I  made  the  choice  to, 
in  essence,  cheat.  I  strongly  believe  that  the  use  of  steroids  and  other  prohibited 
performance enhancing drugs are wrong, and that there is no place for such use in 
sports. However, athletes whom have made that choice are not necessarily bad peo-
ple. In my own situation, there were many factors contributing to the very poor deci-
sion I made which included the influence of a long-time trusted coach. But most im-
portantly, I began using these substances not to give me an advantage, but because 
I had become convinced I needed to use them to level the playing field with my com-
petitors. It is a very troubling situation when you have trained to compete in a sport 
at  the  highest  level,  but  feel  those  with  which  you  are  competing  have  an  unfair 
advantage.  I  make  neither  any  excuse  nor  justification  for  my  horrible  choice.  I 
merely hope to lend some understanding to this Committee as to how someone who 
loved  her  sport  and  trained  cleanly  for  most  of  her  life  got  involved  in  this  awful 
abuse. 

My  attorney,  Jerrold  Colton,  and  I  have  worked  with  assisting  USADA  in  its  ef-
forts,  and  we  believe  this  Committee  should  further  support  USADA  as  the  fight 
is a very difficult one. Being mindful that my use of steroids and other performance-
enhancing drugs was not detected through the extensive testing I received, USADA 
needs  the  resources  to  go  further  in  its  fight  to  detect  the  people  who  are  breaking 
the rules. The BALCO scandal may not have been discovered without a competitor’s 
coach  anonymously  sending  a  syringe  of  THG  to  the  USADA  testers  which  ulti-
mately led to the discovery of this heretofore unknown steroid. 

Although  I  have  been  troubled  by  the  disparity  of  the  penalties  facing  track  ath-
letes  versus  other  sports,  I  am  mindful  we  are  not  protected  by  a  players’  associa-
tion. I appreciate the many reasons why this Committee previously subpoenaed the 
BALCO documents pertaining only to the track and field athletes and turned them 
over  to  USADA  rather  than  the  other  sports,  but  would  like  to  see  a  more  equal 
treatment  of  all  sports.  I  also  believe  the  roles  of  some  national  governing  bodies 
involved  in  sports  and  the  coaches  which  either  assist  in  the  wrongdoing  or  turn 
their backs on what they see must have some responsibility, culpability and penalty 
for  their  role  in  making  sport  unclean.  The  fight  against  drugs  in  sports  is  an  ex-
tremely difficult battle. I am sorry that I cheated myself, my competitors, my sport, 
my  family  and  the  public  for  the  choices  I  made  in  the  past.  As  athletes,  we  know 
we are role models, and I betrayed my responsibility as such. Please feel free to call 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

on me to play any role I can in assisting your Committee, USADA and anyone else 
you see fit in this very important matter. I hope in doing so, I help the sport I love 
more by what I do off the track, than anything I could have ever done on it. Thank 
you  very  much  for  your  kind  attention  and  for  allowing  me  to  appear  here  today.

Senator  MCCAIN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Ms.  White,  and  we  are 
very appreciative that you would come and share your experiences 
with us. We thank you. 
Mr. Blake, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF ROGER BLAKE, ASSISTANT EXECUTIVE 

DIRECTOR, CALIFORNIA INTERSCHOLASTIC FEDERATION 
Mr. BLAKE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you for the oppor-
tunity  to  speak  to  you  today.  My  name  is  Roger  Blake  and  I  serve 
as the Assistant Executive Director of the California Interscholastic 
Federation,  the  governing  body  of  high  school  sports  in  California. 
We are the largest state association in the Nation, with 1,400 high 
schools and 1.7 million students. I have also been a long-time high 
school teacher, coach, athletic director, and school administrator. 

In my role as the Assistant Executive Director of the CIF, I have 
been  given  the  responsibility  of  ensuring  that  our  schools  and  our 
governing bodies were given enough information regarding steroids 
and  performance-enhancing  substances  to  make  an  informed  deci-
sion.  Three  weeks  ago  the  CIF  made  national  headlines  when  the 
representatives of our schools voted unanimously to pass three pro-
posals  that  we  believe  are  key  fundamentals  to  slowing  down  and 
ultimately  eliminating  the  use  of  these  dangerous  drugs  in  our 
schools. 

But  we  would  not  be  where  we  are  today  without  the  assistance 
of  USADA,  particularly  Dr.  Catlin,  Dr.  Gary  Green,  and  Mr.  Rich-
ard Young. Last fall the CIF in conjunction with the demand reduc-
tion  program  of  the  U.S.  Drug  Enforcement  Administration,  spon-
sored  a  steroid  summit  in  Los  Angeles.  Deputy  Director  Scott 
Burns  of  the  ONDCP  spoke  and  Dr.  Catlin  was  one  of  our  key 
speakers.  What  we  learned  that  day,  that  the  time  has  come  that 
we  too  at  the  high  school  level  are  facing  the  same  issues  and  the 
same  dilemmas  that  face  professional  sports  and  our  Olympic  ath-
letes, and that we needed to act immediately. 

We  also  came  to  realize  that  the  science,  the  technology,  and 
most importantly the marketing of these products to the user to get 
bigger, faster, and stronger just by taking this pill or injecting this 
fluid  is  an  explosive  combination.  At  the  high  school  level,  studies 
have  shown  that  the  No.  1  reason  that  kids  play  sports  is  because 
it is fun. But unfortunately in our society today, the winning at all 
costs  mentality,  more  and  more  young  people  are  turning  to 
steroids  and  performance-enhancing  drugs  to  help  give  them  the 
edge. 

Statistics  tell  us  that  just  over  7  million  high  school  students 
participate  in  sports,  but  only  1  percent  of  those  athletes  will  re-
ceive that athletic scholarship to college. The competition for those 
few athletic scholarships is fierce. If we are truly going to make the 
difference,  make  a  difference  in  the  lives  of  millions  of  kids  and 
young  adults,  then  we  must  all  get  on  the  same  page.  We  must 
speak a common language and send a united message that the ille-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

gal  use  of  steroids  and  performance-enhancers  is  cheating  and 
should not and will not be tolerated. 

We  cannot  afford  to  be  naive  about  this  subject.  The  marketing 
of  these  products  is  targeting  our  kids.  Recently  a  California  high 
school athletic director called me and she directed me to her daugh-
ter’s  youth  team  basketball  web  page.  At  the  bottom  of  this  web 
page were two ads, one for muscle-building nutritional supplements 
and  the  other,  HGH  for  athletes.  This  was  on  a  web  page  that  is 
targeting young girls grades 3 through 12. 

We must educate our parents, students, and coaches to the risks, 
dangers,  and  the  warning  signs.  The  CIF  this  spring  developed  a 
CD–ROM  that  we  sent  out  to  our  1,400  member  schools  with  a 
PowerPoint  presentation  with  the  information  so  the  coaches  and 
school  officials  could  distribute  that  information  to  parents  and 
kids.  But  as  the  science  and  technology  will  continue  to  advance, 
the CIF and state associations like us are going to look to USADA 
for help so that we can continue to inform our stakeholders. 

At  the  high  school  and  the  youth  level,  we  must  demand  that 
coaches  are  qualified  and  trained.  In  the  CIF  we  strongly  believe 
that  coaches  are  teachers  first.  Just  as  we  would  want  in  every 
classroom  a  qualified  and  certified  teacher,  we  must  hold  coaches 
to  the  same  level.  Without  a  doubt,  a  student  athlete  probably 
spends  more  time  in  the  presence  of  their  coach  than  with  any 
other  individual,  with  perhaps  the  exception  of  their  parents  or  a 
peer. 

But  these  can  only  be  the  first  steps.  Testing  at  the  high  school 
level  will  be  venturing  into  the  unknown  frontier,  as  we  do  not 
even  know  at  the  high  school  level  what  steroids  or  performance-
enhancers  we  should  advise  schools  to  be  testing  for.  The  banned 
substance  list  from  USADA  and  the  NCAA,  this  is  a  foreign  lan-
guage, one that we do not understand and we do not read. 

We  have  been  quoted  prices  for  testing  kits  for  student  athletes 
that range from $350 to as little as $25. What is reasonable? What 
do we tell our member schools? State associations are going to need 
the help of USADA when our schools move into the testing era. 

The  marketing  of  performance-enhancing  substances  is  a  multi-
billion  dollar  industry  and  the  high  schools  of  the  Nation—and  I 
can speak specifically for California—are going to desperately need 
the  help  and  guidance  of  USADA  as  we  move  into  this  new  era 
that  has  now  reached  down  to  the  high  school  and  youth  sports 
level. 

In  closing,  I  would  like  to  thank  you  for  allowing  me  the  oppor-
tunity to speak today, but also urge you to consider increasing the 
scope  of  the  educational  mission  of  USADA  and  the  funding  that 
increasing that scope will entail. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Blake follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROGER BLAKE, ASSISTANT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

CALIFORNIA INTERSCHOLASTIC FEDERATION 

Mr.  Chairman  and  the  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for 
the opportunity to testify today. My name is Roger Blake and I serve as the Assist-
ant  Executive  Director  of  the  California  Interscholastic  Federation  (CIF),  the  gov-
erning  body  for  high  school  sports  for  California.  We  are  the  largest  state  associa-
tion  in  the  nation  with  almost  1,400  high  schools  and  1.7  million  students.  I  have 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

also been a long time high school teacher, coach, athletic director, and dean and dis-
trict office administrator. 

In  my  role  as  the  Assistant  Executive  Director  of  the  CIF,  I  have  been  given  the 
responsibility for ensuring our schools and governance bodies were given enough in-
formation regarding steroids and performance enhancing substances to make an in-
formed  decision.  Three  weeks  ago,  the  CIF  made  national  headlines  when  the  rep-
resentatives  of  our  schools  voted  unanimously  to  pass  three  proposals  that  we  be-
lieve  are  fundamental  keys  to  slowing  down  and  ultimately  eliminating  the  use  of 
these dangerous drugs in our schools, but we would not be where we are today with-
out  the  assistance  and  USADA,  particularly  Dr.  Catlin,  Dr.  Gary  Green  and  Mr. 
Richard Young. 

Last fall, the CIF in conjunction with the Demand Reduction Program of the U.S. 
Drug  Enforcement  Administration  sponsored  a  ‘‘Steroid  Summit’’  in  Los  Angeles. 
Deputy  Director  Scott  Burns  of  the  ONDCP  spoke  and  Dr.  Catlin  was  one  of  our 
key  speakers.  What  we  learned  that  day  was  that  the  time  has  come  that  we,  too, 
are  facing  the  same  issues  and  dilemmas  that  face  professional  sports  and  our 
Olympic athletes and that we needed to act immediately. 

We also came to realize that as the science, the technology and most importantly 
the  marketing  of  these  products  that  promise  the  user  to  get  bigger,  faster  and 
stronger  just  by  taking  this  pill  or  injecting  fluid  is  an  explosive  combination.  At 
the  high  school  level,  studies  have  shown  that  the  number  one  reason  kids  play 
sports  is  because  it  is  fun,  but  unfortunately  in  our  society  where  the  winning  at 
all cost mentality prevails, more and more young people are turning to steroids and 
performance enhancing drugs to help ‘‘give them the edge.’’

Statistics tell us that over 7 million students participate in high school sports and 
that  just  over  one  percent  of  those  athletes  will  receive  an  athlete  scholarship  to 
college,  yet  the  pressure  and  the  competition  for  those  few  athlete  scholarships  is 
fierce. 

If  we  are  truly  going  to  make  a  difference  in  the  lives  of  millions  of  kids  and 
young adults, then we must all get on the same page. We must all speak a common 
language and send a united message that the illegal use of steroids and performance 
enhancers is cheating and should not and will not be tolerated. 

We cannot not afford to be naive about this subject, the marketing of these prod-
ucts  is  targeting  our  kids.  A  California  high  school  athletic  director  whose  young 
daughter  plays  youth  basketball  recently  called  and  directed  me  to  the  teams’  web 
site.  At  the  bottom  of  their  web  page  were  two  advertisements,  one  for  ‘‘muscle 
building nutrition’’ supplements and the other stating ‘‘HGH for Athletes.’’ And this 
on  a  web  page  that  is  for  young  girls  in  grades  3  through  12  in  the  San  Francisco 
Bay Area. 

We  must  educate  our  parents,  students  and  coaches  to  the  risks,  dangers  and 
warning  signs.  The  CIF  has  developed  and  sent  to  all  of  our  member  schools  this 
CD-Rom that contains a PowerPoint presentation so that school officials and coaches 
could share this information with their players and parents. But as the science and 
technology  continues  to  advance,  we  will  look  to  groups  such  as  USADA  to  help  us 
so that we can continue to inform our stakeholders. 

At the high school and youth level, we must also demand that coaches are quali-
fied and trained. In the CIF we believe strongly that coaches are teachers first and 
just  as  we  would  want  in  every  classroom  a  qualified  and  certified  teacher—the 
same  should  hold  true  for  coaches.  Without  a  doubt  a  student  athlete  probably 
spends more time in the presence of their coach than any other individual with the 
exception of their parents and peers. 

But these can be only the first steps; Testing at the high school level will be ven-
turing  into  the  unknown  frontier  as  we  do  not  even  know  what  steroids  and  per-
formance  enhancers  we  should  advise  schools  to  test  for  and  the  banned  substance 
lists  by  USADA  and  the  NCAA  are  a  foreign  language  that  high  school  coaches  do 
not speak or recognize. We have been quoted prices ranging from $25 dollars to hun-
dreds of dollars per test screening. What is reasonable? What do we tell our schools? 
State Associations will need the help of USADA when and if schools implement test-
ing programs. The marketing of performance enhancing substances is a multi-billion 
dollar industry, the high schools of the nation, and I can speak specifically for Cali-
fornia  are  going  to  desperately  need  the  help  and  guidance  of  the  USADA  as  we 
move  into  this  new  era  that  has  now  reached  down  to  the  high  school  and  youth 
sports level. 

In  closing,  I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee  for  this  opportunity  to  speak  be-
fore  you  and  to  urge  you  to  consider  increasing  the  scope  of  the  mission  of  USADA 
and the funding that increasing that scope would entail. Thank you.

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you very much, Mr. Blake. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Dr. Catlin, welcome back. 

18

STATEMENT  OF  DON  H.  CATLIN,  M.D.,  PROFESSOR  OF
MOLECULAR  AND  MEDICAL  PHARMACOLOGY,  UCLA
MEDICAL SCHOOL 
Dr. CATLIN. Thank you very much, Senator McCain. It is a pleas-
ure  to  be  here  and  an  honor.  I  am  Don  Catlin.  I  am  a  professor 
of molecular and medical pharmacology at UCLA and I am Director 
of the UCLA Olympic Analytical Laboratory, the only laboratory in 
the  United  States  currently  accredited  for  sports  doping  control  by 
WADA, the World Anti-Doping Agency. I have an M.D. degree from 
the  University  of  Rochester  and  my  specialty  is  internal  medicine. 
I  founded  the  Olympic  Laboratory  in  1982  and  have  been  on  nu-
merous international medical commissions. 

My  laboratory  serves  USADA  as  a  primary  client.  It  also  serves 
the  NCAA,  the  Minor  League  program  for  baseball  and  the  Na-
tional Football League, and several smaller clients. 

You  may  think  that  testing  is  wonderful  and  great.  Unfortu-
nately,  it  is  far  from  being  really  perfect.  Athletes  determined  to 
cheat  have  little  trouble  beating  the  test  and  there  are  many  doc-
tors ready and willing to tell them how to do it. 

Bill  Llewellyn,  a  well-known  underground  chemist,  stated  in 
ESPN  Magazine,  quote:  ‘‘There  are  more  than  500  steroids  in  this 
book’’—and he waved the book—and he said, ‘‘All the drug tests in 
the  world  can  maybe  find  50.’’  That  remains  true  today.  That  is 
why research plays such a vital role in the anti-doping effort. 

My  lab  has  taken  in  several  grants  from  USADA,  including  a 
grant to improve EPO testing, a vital area, and a grant to improve 
the  testing  for  testosterone.  These  grants  have  resulted  in  many 
publications and substantial advances in our ability to detect these 
drugs. That type of research, however, is inadequate if a serious ef-
fort  at  eliminating  drug  use  from  sport  is  to  be  accomplished.  The 
most difficult problems have not yet been solved. 

For example, there is no effective test for growth hormone today, 
after 10 years of work. Athletes determined to beat the system are 
still  able  to  keep  ahead.  As  the  BALCO  investigation  has  brought 
to  light,  these  athletes  and  their  gurus  are  well  funded  and  they 
have resources. With the paltry amount of funding currently avail-
able, anti-doping research really does not stand a chance. 

Several  success  stories  will  make  this  point.  You  are  all  aware 
of  THG.  Well,  in  fact  USADA  had  the  wisdom  to  give  us  a  grant 
prior to the discovery of THG to do work on any project that came 
along.  It  just  happened  that  the  first  project  that  came  along  was 
the  syringe  that  the  coach  turned  in  to  USADA.  We  had  $140,000 
of  direct  costs  and  we  were  ready  to  go.  We  had  the  staff  and  it 
took a few weeks before we were able to get the structure of THG. 
We did not have to apply for a grant. We were all ready and willing 
to go. 

After  we  had  identified  it,  it  took  another  month  to  develop  a 
test.  But  it  is  important  to  recognize  that  THG  came  to  USADA 
and  was  given  to  us.  We  were  not  out  there  finding  it  like  we 
should  be.  We  need  to  find  these  drugs  before  athletes  start  using 
them. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

Two  models  of  success  that  most  resemble  the  type  of  research 
that  should  be  going  on  all  the  time  are  darbepoetin  and 
norbolethone.  Darbepoetin  is  an  improved  form  of  EPO.  We  have 
known  it  was  coming  for  years.  We  know  it  is  going  to  replace 
EPO,  and  late  in  2000  it  was  actually  approved  by  the  FDA,  and 
it  was  launched  just  before  the  Salt  Lake  City  games.  We  read  in 
the  paper  that  people  were  kind  of  laughing  at  us  because  we 
would not be able to detect it; it was too new. 

Well, we had done some homework and we were prepared for it, 
and in fact we caught three athletes who won a total of eight med-
als at the Salt Lake City games. 

There are countless other pharmaceuticals that come to the mar-
ket every year. Many of them do enhance performance and may be 
undetectable  by  current  methods.  One  of  the  cardinal  rules  of 
drugs  in  sport  is  that  if  the  drug  might  work  it  will  be  used  until 
its  rightful  place  in  the  cheater’s  armamentarium  is  known.  The 
lesson  learned  from  this  is  that  an  effective  anti-doping  research 
program  must  be  flexible  enough  to  immediately  respond  when 
such pharmaceuticals hit the market. 

Another  example  is  norbolethone,  a  steroid  that  was  actually  in 
development 40 years ago, but it was abandoned because it was too 
toxic.  None  of  the  labs  were  looking  for  it.  We  did  not  know  it  ex-
isted.  But  then  one  day  some  very  clever  scientists  in  my  lab  no-
ticed  something  peculiar  about  a  sample.  Eventually  we  narrowed 
it  down  and,  sure  enough,  we  found  norbolethone  40  years  after  it 
was put on the shelf. 

Ultimately  we  learned  quite  a  bit  about  norbolethone.  We  called 
a  positive  and  soon  the  underground  e-mails  were  explaining  that 
we had already found it and that anybody who was taking it ought 
to lay off. No other cases of norbolethone have ever been found. We 
think it was placed in service around the time of the Sydney games 
in  2000.  This  dramatic  illustration  underlines  the  importance  that 
we keep these projects confidential as well as highly scientific. 

These  stories  should  make  it  clear  to  everyone  exactly  what  we 
are up against. Athletes that cheat have sophisticated advisers and 
chemists.  These  underground  chemists  do  not  have  to  meet  any 
FDA  regulations.  They  have  extraordinary  resources.  We  cannot 
fight  them  effectively  using  the  system  and  resources  that  are  in 
place. 

What  is  needed  is  long-term  substantial  funding  so  that  teams 
of  scientists  with  decades  of  experience  in  anti-doping  can  work  to 
develop  new  tests,  keep  up  with  the  new  drugs,  think  like  dopers, 
and have tests ready to go when they come out. 

In  May  of  2003,  a  bill  was  introduced  in  the  Senate  that  would 
have  helped  address  these  very  issues,  S.  1002,  the  Athletic  Per-
formance–Enhancing  Drug  Research  and  Detection  Act.  That  bill 
would  have  provided  the  much-needed,  long-term,  well  funded  re-
search  to  the  labs  that  have  extensive  experience  in  anti-doping. 
Unfortunately, that bill never got off the ground. 

It  is  also  vital  to  keep  the  work  private  and  secret.  As  the  cases 
of  norbolethone  and  THG  both  teach  us,  as  soon  as  athletes  know 
what  designer  drugs  are  detectable  they  stop  instantly  and  move 
on to something else. Remember the words of Llewellyn waving the 
book: ‘‘There are 500 steroids in here.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

As  I  mentioned  at  the  beginning,  the  kind  of  research  currently 
funded  by  USADA  is  a  necessary  part  of  the  anti-doping  effort.  It 
keeps  labs  worldwide  up  to  date  on  their  methods.  It  is,  unfortu-
nately,  completely  inadequate  to  keep  up  with  cheaters.  If  you 
want  to  seriously  address  drugs  in  sport,  then  a  long-term,  well-
funded, flexible and confidential research program is what is need-
ed. 

To  help  this  fight,  I  have  recently  established  the  Anti-Doping 
Research  Institute.  Our  efforts  will  focus  on  many  of  these  areas 
I  have  outlined  for  you.  It  is  one  small  step.  Without  adequate 
funding for USADA, independent anti-doping efforts are doomed to 
always be behind the cheaters. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Catlin follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DON H. CATLIN, M.D., PROFESSOR OF MOLECULAR AND 

MEDICAL PHARMACOLOGY, UCLA MEDICAL SCHOOL 

My name is Don Catlin. I am a Professor of Molecular and Medical Pharmacology 
at  the  University  of  California  at  Los  Angeles  Medical  School  and  the  Director  of 
the  UCLA  Olympic  Analytical  Laboratory,  the  only  lab  in  the  U.S.  accredited  for 
sports doping control by WADA, the World Anti-Doping Agency. I have an M.D. de-
gree  from  the  University  of  Rochester  and  my  specialty  is  Internal  Medicine.  I 
founded the UCLA Olympic Lab in 1982 and have been on the International Olym-
pic  Committee  Medical  Commission  for  many  years,  contributing  expertise  on  sci-
entific  policy,  medical  issues,  and  laboratory  methods.  I  have  served  on  numerous 
national and international committees concerned with drugs in sports. 

You  may  think  testing  is  great,  but  it  is  far  from  perfect.  Athletes  determined  to 
cheat  have  little  trouble  beating  the  test . . . and  there  are  legions  of  doctors  tell-
ing  them  how  to  do  it.  Bill  Llewellyn,  a  well-known  underground  chemist,  stated 
in  ESPN  magazine  ‘‘There  are  more  than  500  steroids  in  here’’  he  says,  flipping  [a 
private book he keeps] to make his point. ‘‘All the drug tests in the world can maybe 
find  50.’’  That  remains  true  today.  This  is  why  research  plays  such  a  vital  role  in 
the  anti-doping  effort.  My  lab  has  taken  in  several  grants  from  USADA,  including 
a grant to dramatically improve urine testing for EPO, a blood booster, and a grant 
to improve carbon isotope ratio, or CIR, analysis. The grants resulted in substantial 
advances in our ability to detect prohibited drugs. 

That  type  of  research,  however,  is  inadequate  if  a  serious  effort  at  eliminating 
drug  use  in  sports  is  to  be  accomplished.  The  most  difficult  problems  have  still  not 
been  solved.  For  example,  there  is  no  effective  test  for  growth  hormone  today.  Ath-
letes  determined  to  beat  the  system  are  still  able  to  keep  ahead  of  the  game.  As 
the BALCO investigation has brought to light, these athletes have sophisticated re-
sources and are well funded. With the paltry amount of funding currently available, 
anti-doping research does not stand a chance. Several success stories will help illus-
trate this point. 

All  of  you  are  aware  of  designer  steroid  THG.  USADA  provided  my  lab  with  ap-
proximately  $140,000  in  direct  costs  to  defray  the  costs  of  identifying  an  unknown 
substance  in  a  used  syringe.  This  money  was  only  available  because  USADA  had 
given  my  lab  a  small  unrestricted  grant  to  provide  us  some  flexibility—only  a  few 
weeks before the syringe was turned over to USADA. Thus we did not have to apply 
for a grant to determine the contents of the syringe—a process that takes months—
we  were  ready  to  go.  It  took  our  team  of  scientists—a  team  that  represents  over 
a  century  of  total  years  of  experience  in  anti-doping—one  month  to  identify  it  and 
another  six  weeks  to  develop  a  test.  It’s  important  to  remember  this  research  was 
done  on  a  substance  brought  to  us.  In  other  words  we  were  not  out  looking  for  de-
signer steroids—it just came to us. If it were not for the unidentified coach bringing 
USADA  the  syringe,  it  is  possible  that  THG  would  still  be  in  wide  use  today.  We 
need to find these drugs before athletes start using them. 

Two  models  of  success  that  most  resemble  the  type  of  research  that  should  be 
going on all the time are darbepoetin and norbolethone. Darbepoetin is an improved 
form of EPO. Late in 2001 just before the Salt Lake Olympic Games opened, it was 
approved  for  medical  use  by  the  FDA.  The  product  was  launched  approximately 
three months prior to the Games. Media publications before the Games had warned 
of its likely use because it was ‘‘undetectable.’’ Our lab, however, had done the nec-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

essary work to obtain reference standards required to report potential positive cases. 
Our insight was correct; it was in use and because we came prepared, three athletes 
who  had  won  a  total  of  eight  medals  were  all  caught  as  darbepoetin  users.  There 
are  countless  other  pharmaceuticals  that  come  to  the  market  every  year.  Many  of 
them  are  performance  enhancing  drugs  that  may  be  undetectable  by  the  methods 
currently employed world wide in anti-doping. One of the cardinal rules of drugs in 
sport  is  that  if  the  drug  might  work  it  will  be  used  until  its  place  in  the  cheater’s 
armamentarium  is  known.  The  lesson  learned  from  this  is  that  an  effective  anti-
doping research program must be flexible enough to immediately respond when such 
pharmaceuticals hit the market. 

Another  example  is  norbolethone—a  steroid  that  was  abandoned  by  the  pharma-
ceutical  industry  before  it  ever  made  it  to  market  over  40  years  ago.  It  was  not 
looked for in the normal steroid test used by all anti-doping labs world-wide. In this 
way it was essentially like THG—an unknown and undetectable steroid. Some very 
clever scientists at my lab noticed something peculiar about a sample. After review 
by  our  team,  we  all  agreed  something  was  there  and  we  set  out  to  determine  what 
it  was.  Ultimately  we  determined  its  structure  and  began  monitoring  it  in  our  rou-
tine screen. Although this was not known at the time, it did not take long after we 
reported  a  norbolethone  positive  for  e-mails  to  circulate  among  the  underground 
chemists  informing  cheating  athletes  that  my  lab  was  on  to  them.  Just  as  with 
THG,  it  is  now  part  of  the  testing  process  world  wide,  but  no  other  case  of 
norbolethone use has ever been found. This dramatic illustration underlines the im-
portance of confidentiality. 

These stories should make clear to everyone exactly what we are up against. The 
athletes  that  cheat  have  sophisticated  advisors  and  chemists.  These  underground 
chemists  do  not  have  to  meet  FDA  regulations.  They  also  have  extraordinary  re-
sources.  We  cannot  fight  them  effectively  using  the  system  and  resources  that  are 
in place. What is needed is long-term, substantial funding so that teams of scientists 
with decades of experience in anti-doping (1) can work, sometimes with drug compa-
nies, to develop tests for new pharmaceuticals before they are even available to the 
public;  and  (2)  can  spend  the  time  thinking  like  the  dopers  and  develop  tests  for 
these  designer  drugs  before  athletes  start  using  them.  In  May  of  2003  a  bill  was 
introduced  in  the  Senate  that  would  have  helped  address  these  very  issues,  S. 
1002—the  ‘‘Athletic  Performance-Enhancing  Drugs  Research  and  Detection  Act.’’ 
That  bill  would  have  provided  the  much-needed  long  term,  well-funded  research  to 
the labs that have extensive experience in anti-doping. Unfortunately that bill never 
got off the ground. 

It  is  also  vital  to  keep  the  work  secret.  As  the  cases  of  norbolethone  and  THG 
both  teach  us,  as  soon  as  the  athletes  know  that  the  designer  drug  they  are  using 
is  detectable  they  stop  using  that  particular  drug  and  move  on  to  something  else. 
( Remember  the  words  of  Llewellyn—‘‘there  are  more  than  500  steroids  in  here.’’ ) 
As I mentioned at the beginning, the kind of research currently funded by USADA 
is  a  necessary  part  of  the  anti-doping  effort.  It  keeps  labs  world  wide  up  to  date 
on their testing methods. It is, unfortunately, completely inadequate to keep up with 
the  cheaters.  If  you  want  to  seriously  address  drugs  in  sport  then  long  term,  well-
funded, flexible and confidential research is what is needed. 

To help this fight, I have recently established the Anti-Doping Research Institute 
(ADR).  Our  efforts  will  focus  on  many  of  these  areas  I  have  outlined  for  you  today. 
But  it  is  just  one  small  step.  Without  adequate  funding  and  independence,  anti-
doping efforts are doomed to always be behind the cheaters.

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you very much, and I want to thank the 

witnesses for being here. 

I  guess  one  of  the  simple  questions  is,  how  do  you  keep  up? 
Every  witness  just  about  talks  about  the  fact  that  there  are  many 
substances  that  are  being  developed  all  the  time  to  enhance  per-
formance. How do you keep up, Mr. Madden? 

Mr.  MADDEN.  Senator,  I  would  agree  with  Dr.  Catlin.  We  have 
got a monstrous job here. We are contributing $2 million a year to 
research  on  average.  The  World  Anti-Doping  Agency  I  believe  in 
the  last  few  years  has  been  in  the  $2  to  $3  million  range.  Around 
the world there is not much beyond that, a little in Australia, a lit-
tle here and there. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

that? 

I  would  guess,  the  experts  have  told  me—I  do  not  know,  Don—
we  need  a  good  $15  million  out  there  per  year  to  do  the  research. 
I  will  tell  you  that  since  the  BALCO  investigation  began—and  the 
U.S.  Attorney’s  investigation  was  some  10  months  ahead  of  any-
thing  we  found  out  about  with  the  syringe—that  we  have  received 
a  constant  stream  of  information  from  athletes,  coaches,  and  ath-
letes’  support  personnel  directing  us  in  the  right  direction  to  fol-
lowup  leads  and  investigate  cases.  So  the  good  news  is  the  clean 
athletes  want  to  participate  in  our  program  and  they  are  partici-
pating  two  ways:  one,  by  testing;  but  the  other  is  by  providing  us 
with information we can act on. 

But  I  am  sure  we  need  a  minimum  of  $15  to  $20  million  in  the 

research area to get ahead of the game. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Dr.  Catlin,  do  you  have  anything  to  add  to 

Dr.  CATLIN.  Part  of  the  issue  is  to  be  able  to  recruit  really  good 
scientists  and  maintain  them  and  keep  them.  Small  grants  that 
last for a couple years will not do that. A top-level scientist is look-
ing for a job in perpetuity and they take about $250,000 a year just 
to  maintain  them  and  to  pay  them  and  to  get  them  with  supplies. 
So  we  need  to  have  people  like  that  who  are  working  and  will 
come.  We  need  to  attract  them.  They  are  out  there.  They  are  just 
not  working  for  us.  We  need  to  pull  them  in  and  get  them  really 
tuned in to this. 

I think—I know this can be done. We get really good people from 
time to time, but we cannot keep them because I only have funding 
for a year or two. 

Second,  we  need  to  be  able  to  purchase  really  high-end  equip-
ment,  equipment  that  costs  $500,000  to  $1,000,000  a  year.  That  is 
expensive, but this is the kind of thing you need if you want to de-
tect growth hormone and other things that are out there. 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you. 
Mr.  Madden,  several  NFL  players  have  been  involved  with 
BALCO and only an average of six players per season over the past 
three  seasons  have  been  suspended  by  the  NFL  for  drug  use.  Do 
you  believe  that  the  NFL’s  testing  program  is  rigid  or  adequate? 
Mr. MADDEN. I would say, Senator, it is the best program in the 
professional  leagues  by  far.  I  would  say  that  no  drug  program  is 
perfect.  I  am  sure  USADA’s  could  be  improved  in  many  ways.  We 
are working together with the NFL and the new laboratory at Utah 
that  we  hope  will  open  late  this  year  or  early  next  year.  But  it  is 
the best the pro sports are offering, but we all need to improve our 
drug testing systems. 

Senator MCCAIN. Marion Jones called USADA ‘‘a secret kangaroo 

court.’’ How do you respond to that? 

Mr. MADDEN. Well, we do not comment on athletes that—wheth-
er  we  are  investigating  them  or  not,  until  we  bring  forth  a  case. 
Our  procedures  in  regard  to  the  legal  aspects  are  foolproof.  We 
have  an  A  test,  we  have  a  B  test,  we  have  an  independent  review 
board  that  tells  us  to  go  forward,  acting  as  a  grand  jury.  The  ath-
letes  then  have  a  right  to  a  hearing,  a  right  to  an  appeal,  a  right 
to counsel, a right to cross-examination. They have all the inherent 
rights within the United States justice system. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

We  are  very  proud  of  the  way  we  act.  We  are  very  proud  of  ev-

erything we do. 

Senator MCCAIN. Ms. White, I want to thank you again for being 
here  today.  In  your  statement  you  say  you  were  able  to  pass  17 
drug tests both in and out of competition while utilizing prohibited 
performance-enhancing  substances.  Is  it  just  that  they  were  not 
testing for the substances you were using? 

Ms. WHITE. Correct. At the time they did not have THG in their 
possession.  And  we  also  had  different  substances  that  were  cov-
ering up the steroids that we were using also. 

Senator MCCAIN. In your written testimony you made a very in-
teresting  statement.  It  was  interesting  to  me.  You  say:  ‘‘But  most 
importantly, I began using these substances, not to give me an ad-
vantage, but because I had become convinced I needed to use them 
to level the playing field with my competitors.’’

I  infer  from  that  that  you  believe  your  competitors  were  also 

using performance-enhancing substances. Is that correct? 

Ms.  WHITE.  It  is  very  sad.  I  can  look  at  quite  a  few  people  and 
say that they are, they were doing the exact same thing that I was 
doing. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  So  basically,  if  you  wanted  to  stay  in  the  top 
level  you  had  to  do  what  at  least  you  believed  that  your  competi-
tors were doing; is that correct? 

Ms. WHITE. Correct. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  That  is  kind  of  a  sad  commentary  and  I  am 

sorry that you—that that may have been the case. 

You also say: ‘‘I believe the roles of some national governing bod-
ies  involved  in  sports  and  the  coaches  which  either  assist  in  the 
wrongdoing  or  turn  their  backs  on  what  they  see  must  have  some 
responsibility, culpability, and penalty for their role in making the 
sport unclean.’’ Would you care to elaborate a little on that? 

Ms. WHITE. I look at myself and for my actions I have been sus-
pended from my sport for 2 years. But my coach continues to coach. 
Although he has been indicted in the BALCO case, he is still coach-
ing  at  this  time,  which  there  is  no  effect  to  him.  He  still  makes 
money. 

I believe that USA Track and Field has not helped the fight with 
USADA  and  the  communication  there  I  think  is  broken  and  they 
need to help also in this fight. 

Senator MCCAIN. Mr. Scherr, it does not seem fair, as Ms. White 
pointed out, that the individual athlete tests positive, but the coach 
who  bears  some  responsibility  continues  to  coach  and  to  receive 
money. Do you have a comment on that? 

Mr.  SCHERR.  I  believe  that  her  position  is  absolutely  correct.  I 
think there are mechanisms, but we have not bridged that gap into 
pursuing  those  opportunities  to  penalize  coaches,  doctors,  trainers, 
or  others  who  surround  the  athletes  who  might  encourage  the 
cheating,  and  I  think  those  penalties  need  to  be  looked  at,  they 
need to be imposed, and they need to be harsh. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Well,  I  hope  that  we  would—that  particularly 
the Olympics, because of the relationship between coaches and ath-
letes,  that  they  would  look  at  the  responsibility  that  coaches  have 
as  well  as  the  athletes.  I  hope  you  would  have  a  look  at  that,  Mr. 
Scherr. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

Mr.  Blake,  you  testified  that  7  percent  of  pre-high  school  young 
women in America are using performance-enhancing drugs; is that 
correct? 

Mr. BLAKE. I believe that was his testimony [indicating]. 
Senator MCCAIN. Why would they be doing that? 
Mr.  BLAKE.  Well,  there  are  two  types.  At  the  high  school  and 
youth  sports  level,  surveys  are  showing  two  types  of  users  of  per-
formance enhancers. One is the athlete looking to get that scholar-
ship,  to  move  to  the  next  level,  to  get  the  edge.  The  other  is  the 
vanity user that we are starting to see now in society, of kids tak-
ing  performance  enhancers,  not  because  they  are  athletes  and  in 
competition,  but  they  want  to  look  perfect.  They  want  to  have  the 
perfect  cut  muscles,  that  model  look  that  you  see  in  a  magazine. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Dr.  Catlin,  it  seems  to  me  that  the  over-
whelming testimony here means that the lesson we should draw is 
not  only  that  we  need  rigorous  and  enforced  testing  but  also  that 
it really matters who does the testing. 

Dr.  CATLIN.  It  does.  We  are  up  against  it.  We  are  the  only  lab 
today  in  the  United  States,  and  have  been  for  23  years.  There  is 
a reason for that. But our work is really not widely understood out-
side  of  the  lab,  unfortunately,  the  kinds  of  things  we  have  to  do, 
the kinds of tests. The documents that we have to pile up are huge. 
So when a Terry Madden and his group of attorneys go into court 
against  an  athlete,  they  have  got  a  stack  of  papers  like  that  [indi-
cating]  and  we  prepare  all  of  that.  But  we  are  facing  people  out 
there  who  do  not  follow  any  rules.  They  do  not  have  to  go  to  the 
FDA  and  get  THG  approved.  They  just  mix,  mix  up  a  batch  of  it, 
and  they  have  figured  out  a  way  to  do  it  so  that  we  cannot  detect 
it, at least at first. 

Once  we  finally  get  hold  of  the  steroid  and  get  our  grip  on  it, 
then we can detect it, and then they stop and they go to something 
else.  This  goes  on  and  on.  I  know  how  to  do  testing.  I  have  been 
doing it for 23 years. I do not want to wake up in 5 years with an-
other THG. I want to put an end to it now and I think I know how 
to do it, and it can be done and it should be done. 

This is not a situation where you need 25 laboratories. You need 
very  few  labs,  but  ones  who  can  focus  more  and  more  research  on 
the problems. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  Mr.  Scherr,  you  mentioned  that  you  supported 
increased funding for USADA in order to help have meaningful en-
forcement. Would you submit for the record a statement about how 
much money and what those uses would go to for us, please? 

Mr. SCHERR. Yes, we can. We will submit that. 
Senator  MCCAIN.  Ms.  White,  again,  I  noticed  in  your  testimony 
that  you  said  you  began  competitive  track  at  the  age  of  10.  How 
old  were  you  when  you  started  feeling  these  pressures?  Were  you 
in high school when you became aware that people were—that this 
use of performance-enhancing drugs was taking place? 

Ms. WHITE. No, I was out of college by then, that is when I start-

ed really seeing the people around me, when I was professional. 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  see.  Well,  again  we  thank  you  for  being  here 

today. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

I thank the witnesses. We will be introducing legislation with our 
friends  on  the  House  side  today  to  hopefully  address  some  of  this 
issue.  We  thank  you  for  being  here  and  thank  you  for  all  you  do. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 10:57 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  11:55 Dec 22, 2005 Jkt 024722 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\24722.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

